Utah statutes.
20A-7-508.   Ballot title -- Duties of local clerk and local attorney.
(1)  Whenever an initiative petition is declared sufficient for submission to
a vote of the people, the local clerk shall deliver a copy of the petition and
the proposed law to the local attorney.
(2)  The local attorney shall:
(a)  entitle each county or municipal initiative that has qualified for the
ballot "Proposition Number __" and give it a number as assigned under Section
20A-6-107;
(b)  prepare a proposed ballot title for the initiative;
(c)  file the proposed ballot title and the numbered initiative titles with
the local clerk within 15 days after the date the initiative petition is
declared sufficient for submission to a vote of the people; and
(d)  promptly provide notice of the filing of the proposed ballot title to:
(i)  the sponsors of the petition; and
(ii)  the local legislative body for the jurisdiction where the initiative
petition was circulated.
(3) (a)  The ballot title may be distinct from the title of the proposed law
attached to the initiative petition, and shall express, in not exceeding 100
words, the purpose of the measure.
(b)  In preparing a ballot title, the local attorney shall, to the best of his
ability, give a true and impartial statement of the purpose of the measure.
(c)  The ballot title may not intentionally be an argument, or likely to
create prejudice, for or against the measure.
(4) (a)  Within five calendar days after the date the local attorney files a
proposed ballot title under Subsection (2)(c), the local legislative body for
the jurisdiction where the initiative petition was circulated and the sponsors
of the petition may file written comments in response to the proposed ballot
title with the local clerk.
(b)  Within five calendar days after the last date to submit written comments
under Subsection (4)(a), the local attorney shall:
(i)  review any written comments filed in accordance with Subsection (4)(a);
(ii)  prepare a final ballot title that meets the requirements of Subsection
(3); and
(iii)  return the petition and file the ballot title with the local clerk.
(c)  Subject to Subsection (6), the ballot title, as determined by the local
attorney, shall be printed on the official ballot.
(5)  Immediately after the local attorney files a copy of the ballot title
with the local clerk, the local clerk shall serve a copy of the ballot title
by mail upon the sponsors of the petition and the local legislative body for
the jurisdiction where the initiative petition was circulated.
(6) (a)  If the ballot title furnished by the local attorney is unsatisfactory
or does not comply with the requirements of this section, the decision of the
local attorney may be appealed by a petition to the Supreme Court that is
brought by:
(i)  at least three sponsors of the initiative petition; or
(ii)  a majority of the local legislative body for the jurisdiction where the
initiative petition was circulated.
(b)  The Supreme Court shall examine the measures and consider arguments, and,
in its decision, may certify to the local clerk a ballot title for the measure
that fulfills the intent of this section.
(c)  The local clerk shall print the title certified by the Supreme Court on
the official ballot.
